Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-175.01
Brand inspection service area,
defined.

Brand
inspection service area means all Nebraska counties and areas of Nebraska
counties contiguous with the brand inspection area designated by section 54-1,109.

Laws 2014, LB768, § 4.